Wisconsin, session 2025, SB1021.
do enact as follows:SB1021,11Section 1. 50.032 (2f) of the statutes is created to read:SB1021,2,5250.032 (2f) Fall prevention and recovery training program. (a) Each 3adult family home shall administer the training program under s. 50.15 (1) (a) to 4each employee of the adult family home who is required under s. 50.15 (1) (b) to 5receive the training.SB1021,2,96(b) Each adult family home shall administer the training under s. 50.15 (2) to 7each resident of the adult family home within 30 days after the resident moves in to 8the adult family home, unless a health care provider certifies that the resident is 9not capable of completing the training program.SB1021,210Section 2. 50.032 (2j) of the statutes is created to read:SB1021,3,31150.032 (2j) CPR and first aid certification. At all times during which a 12resident is present in an adult family home, the adult family home shall have 13available on the premises at least one employee with current certification in 1cardiopulmonary resuscitation, at least one employee with current certification in 2first aid, and at least one employee who has received training in fall prevention, fall 3recovery, and proper techniques for lifting and moving residents.SB1021,34Section 3. 50.032 (2k) of the statutes is created to read:SB1021,3,7550.032 (2k) Duty to administer aid. (a) Subject to any known declaration 6or do-not-resuscitate order under ch. 154, an adult family home has a duty to do all 7of the following:SB1021,3,1381. Administer cardiopulmonary resuscitation before the arrival of emergency 9medical services to a resident who is nonresponsive or has a cessation of normal 10respiration. The cardiopulmonary resuscitation shall be administered by or under 11the direction of an individual who is certified in cardiopulmonary resuscitation and 12shall be performed in accordance with that individual’s cardiopulmonary 13resuscitation certification training.SB1021,3,17142. Administer first aid before the arrival of emergency medical services to a 15resident who is in distress. The first aid shall be administered by or under the 16direction of an individual who is certified in first aid and shall be performed in 17accordance with that individual’s first aid certification training.SB1021,3,23183. Before contacting emergency medical services, make an attempt to lift a 19resident who has fallen, appears to be uninjured, and is unable to reasonably 20recover independently. The lift shall be attempted by or under the direction of an 21individual who has received training in first aid or in fall prevention, fall recovery, 22and proper techniques for lifting and moving residents and shall be performed in 23accordance with that individual’s training.SB1021,4,224(b) An adult family home may not have, establish, or implement a policy that 1prevents an individual from providing appropriate cardiopulmonary resuscitation 2or first aid or attempting to lift a fallen resident who appears to be uninjured.SB1021,43Section 4. 50.033 (2f) of the statutes is created to read:SB1021,4,7450.033 (2f) Fall prevention and recovery training program. (a) Each 5adult family home shall administer the training program under s. 50.15 (1) (a) to 6each employee of the adult family home who is required under s. 50.15 (1) (b) to 7receive the training.SB1021,4,118(b) Each adult family home shall administer the training under s. 50.15 (2) to 9each resident of the adult family home within 30 days after the resident moves in to 10the adult family home, unless a health care provider certifies that the resident is 11not capable of completing the training program.SB1021,512Section 5. 50.033 (2j) of the statutes is created to read:SB1021,4,181350.033 (2j) CPR and first aid certification. At all times during which a 14resident is present in an adult family home, the adult family home shall have 15available on the premises at least one employee with current certification in 16cardiopulmonary resuscitation, at least one employee with current certification in 17first aid, and at least one employee who has received training in fall prevention, fall 18recovery, and proper techniques for lifting and moving residents.SB1021,619Section 6. 50.033 (2k) of the statutes is created to read:SB1021,4,222050.033 (2k) Duty to administer aid. (a) Subject to any known declaration 21or do-not-resuscitate order under ch. 154, an adult family home has a duty to do all 22of the following:SB1021,5,4231. Administer cardiopulmonary resuscitation before the arrival of emergency 24medical services to a resident who is nonresponsive or has a cessation of normal 1respiration. The cardiopulmonary resuscitation shall be administered by or under 2the direction of an individual who is certified in cardiopulmonary resuscitation and 3shall be performed in accordance with that individual’s cardiopulmonary 4resuscitation certification training.SB1021,5,852. Administer first aid before the arrival of emergency medical services to a 6resident who is in distress. The first aid shall be administered by or under the 7direction of an individual who is certified in first aid and shall be performed in 8accordance with that individual’s first aid certification training.SB1021,5,1493. Before contacting emergency medical services, make an attempt to lift a 10resident who has fallen, appears to be uninjured, and is unable to reasonably 11recover independently. The lift shall be attempted by or under the direction of an 12individual who has received training in first aid or in fall prevention, fall recovery, 13and proper techniques for lifting and moving residents and shall be performed in 14accordance with that individual’s training.SB1021,5,1715(b) An adult family home may not have, establish, or implement a policy that 16prevents an individual from providing appropriate cardiopulmonary resuscitation 17or first aid or attempting to lift a fallen resident who appears to be uninjured.SB1021,718Section 7. 50.034 (3) (f) of the statutes is created to read:SB1021,5,211950.034 (3) (f) Administer the training program under s. 50.15 (1) (a) to each 20employee of the residential care apartment complex who is required under s. 50.15 21(1) (b) to receive the training.SB1021,822Section 8. 50.034 (3) (g) of the statutes is created to read:SB1021,6,32350.034 (3) (g) Administer the training program under s. 50.15 (2) to each 1resident of the residential care apartment complex within 30 days after the resident 2moves in to the residential care apartment complex, unless a health care provider 3certifies that the resident is not capable of completing the training program.SB1021,94Section 9. 50.034 (3) (h) of the statutes is created to read:SB1021,6,10550.034 (3) (h) At all times during which a resident is present in the 6residential care apartment complex, have available on the premises at least one 7employee with current certification in cardiopulmonary resuscitation, at least one 8employee with current certification in first aid, and at least one employee who has 9received training in fall prevention, fall recovery, and proper techniques for lifting 10and moving residents.SB1021,1011Section 10. 50.034 (3m) of the statutes is created to read:SB1021,6,141250.034 (3m) Duty to administer aid. (a) Subject to any known declaration 13or do-not-resuscitate order under ch. 154, a residential care apartment complex has 14a duty to do all of the following:SB1021,6,20151. Administer cardiopulmonary resuscitation before the arrival of emergency 16medical services to a resident who is nonresponsive or has a cessation of normal 17respiration. The cardiopulmonary resuscitation shall be administered by or under 18the direction of an individual who is certified in cardiopulmonary resuscitation and 19shall be performed in accordance with that individual’s cardiopulmonary 20resuscitation certification training.SB1021,7,2212. Administer first aid before the arrival of emergency medical services to a 22resident who is in distress. The first aid shall be administered by or under the 1direction of an individual who is certified in first aid and shall be performed in 2accordance with that individual’s first aid certification training.SB1021,7,833. Before contacting emergency medical services, make an attempt to lift a 4resident who has fallen, appears to be uninjured, and is unable to reasonably 5recover independently. The lift shall be attempted by or under the direction of an 6individual who has received training in first aid or in fall prevention, fall recovery, 7and proper techniques for lifting and moving residents and shall be performed in 8accordance with that individual’s training.SB1021,7,129(b) A residential care apartment complex may not have, establish, or 10implement a policy that prevents an individual from providing appropriate 11cardiopulmonary resuscitation or first aid or attempting to lift a fallen resident who 12appears to be uninjured.SB1021,1113Section 11. 50.035 (1) (d) of the statutes is created to read:SB1021,7,161450.035 (1) (d) Each community-based residential facility shall administer the 15training program under s. 50.15 (1) (a) to each employee of the community-based 16residential facility who is required under s. 50.15 (1) (b) to receive the training.SB1021,1217Section 12. 50.035 (1m) of the statutes is created to read:SB1021,7,231850.035 (1m) Resident fall prevention training. Each community-based 19residential facility shall administer the training program under s. 50.15 (2) to each 20resident of the community-based residential facility within 30 days after the 21resident moves in to the community-based residential facility, unless a health care 22provider certifies that the resident is not capable of completing the training 23program.SB1021,131Section 13. 50.035 (7) of the statutes is created to read:SB1021,8,8250.035 (7) CPR and first aid certification. At all times during which a 3resident is present in a community-based residential facility, the community-based 4residential facility shall have available on the premises at least one employee with 5current certification in cardiopulmonary resuscitation, at least one employee with 6current certification in first aid, and at least one employee who has received 7training in fall prevention, fall recovery, and proper techniques for lifting and 8moving residents.SB1021,149Section 14. 50.035 (8) of the statutes is created to read:SB1021,8,121050.035 (8) Duty to administer aid. (a) Subject to any known declaration or 11do-not-resuscitate order under ch. 154, a community-based residential facility has a 12duty to do all of the following:SB1021,8,18131. Administer cardiopulmonary resuscitation before the arrival of emergency 14medical services to a resident who is nonresponsive or has a cessation of normal 15respiration. The cardiopulmonary resuscitation shall be administered by or under 16the direction of an individual who is certified in cardiopulmonary resuscitation and 17shall be performed in accordance with that individual’s cardiopulmonary 18resuscitation certification training. Down Down /2025/related/proposals/sb1021 true proposaltext /2025/related/proposals/sb1021 proposaltext/2025/REG/SB1021 proposaltext/2025/REG/SB1021 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Proposal Text»SB1021: Bill Text × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting